Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-301
Herd laws; stock grower, cattle drover, defined.

Every person who shall keep neat cattle, horses, mules, sheep, or goats, for their growth or increase within the state, shall be deemed a stock grower. Any person who shall drive or bring neat cattle into or through this state shall be deemed a cattle drover.

Laws 1879, § 1, p. 67;

R.S.1913, § 96;

C.S.1922, § 104;

C.S.1929, § 54-301;

R.S.1943, § 54-301.